Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-541
Homing pigeon; protection; violation; penalty.

Any person, other than the owner thereof, who shall knowingly shoot, kill, maim, or injure any Antwerp or homing pigeon, commonly called Carrier Pigeon, or who shall entrap, catch, detain, or remove any mark, band, or other means of identification from such pigeon, shall be guilty of a Class V misdemeanor.

Laws 1971, LB 811, § 1;

Laws 1977, LB 40, § 183;

R.S.1943, (1993), § 37-309;

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 261.